Maryland, session 2025, HB0796.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
7–105.1.
(e) An order to docket or a complaint to foreclose a mortgage or deed of trust on
residential property shall:
(1) Include:
(i) If applicable, the license number of:
1. The mortgage originator; and
2. The mortgage lender; and
(ii) An affidavit stating:
1. The date on which the default occurred and the nature of
the default; and
2. If applicable, that:
A. A notice of intent to foreclose was sent to the mortgagor or
grantor in accordance with subsection (c) of this section and the date on which the notice
was sent; and
– 1 –

Ch. 581 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
B. At the time the notice of intent to foreclose was sent, the
contents of the notice of intent to foreclose were accurate; and
(2) Be accompanied by:
(i) The original or a certified copy of the mortgage or deed of trust;
(ii) A statement of the debt remaining due and payable supported by
an affidavit of the plaintiff or the secured party or the agent or attorney of the plaintiff or
secured party;
(iii) A copy of the debt instrument accompanied by an affidavit
certifying ownership of the debt instrument;
(iv) If applicable, the original or a certified copy of the assignment of
the mortgage for purposes of foreclosure or the deed of appointment of a substitute trustee;
(v) If any defendant is an individual, an affidavit that is in
compliance with § 521 of the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, 50 U.S.C. App. § 501 et seq.;
(vi) If applicable, a copy of the notice of intent to foreclose;
(vii) If the secured party and mortgagor or grantor have elected to
participate in prefile mediation, the report of the prefile mediation issued by the Office of
Administrative Hearings;
(viii) If the secured party and the mortgagor or grantor have not
elected to participate in prefile mediation, a statement that the parties have not elected to
participate in prefile mediation;
(ix) In addition to any other filing fees required by law, a filing fee in
the amount of [$300] $600 $450; and
(x) 1. If the loss mitigation analysis has been completed subject
to subsection (g) of this section, a final loss mitigation affidavit in the form prescribed by
regulation adopted by the Commissioner of Financial Regulation; and
2. If the loss mitigation analysis has not been completed, a
preliminary loss mitigation affidavit in the form prescribed by regulation adopted by the
Commissioner of Financial Regulation.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –